Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB789.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 205.540 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Medicaid[An] Advisory Committee[Council for Medical Assistance] shall be
established in accordance with 42 C.F.R. sec. 431.12[the state government].
(2) The Medicaid Advisory Committee shall advise the Cabinet for Health and
Family Services and the Department for Medicaid Services on matters related to
policy development and effective administration of the Medicaid program and
may advise on any topic identified in 42 C.F.R. sec. 431.12(g).
(3) The Medicaid Advisory Committee[council] shall consist of thirty-five (35)[twenty-
two (22)] members as follows:
(a) The commissioner of the Department for Medicaid Services, or his or her
designee, who shall serve as an ex officio, nonvoting member and co-chair
of the committee;
(b) The commissioner of the Department for Public Health, or his or her
designee, who shall serve as an ex officio, nonvoting member of the
committee;
(c) The commissioner of the Department for Behavioral Health, Development
and Intellectual Disabilities, who shall serve as an ex officio, nonvoting
member of the committee; and
(d) The following thirty-two (32) members who[. The secretary for health and
family services shall be an ex officio member. The other twenty-one (21)
members of the council] shall be appointed by the commissioner of the
Department for Medicaid Services as follows and in accordance with
subsections (4) and (5) of this section:[Governor]
1. Fifteen (15) appointments shall be made one (1) from each list of
three (3) nominees submitted by the following organizations, or their
Page 1 of 13
XXXX 2/18/2025 3:49 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 946
successor organizations:
a. The Brain Injury Alliance of Kentucky;
b. The Kentucky Association of Health Care Facilities;
c. The Kentucky Association of Private Providers;
d. The Kentucky Association of Regional Programs;
e. The Kentucky Chapter of the American Academy of Pediatrics;
f. The Kentucky Dental Association;
g. The Kentucky Home Health Association;
h. The Kentucky Hospital Association;
i. The Kentucky Medical Equipment Suppliers Association;
j. The Kentucky Nurses' Association;
k. The Kentucky Optometric Association;
l. The Kentucky Pharmacists Associations;
m. The Kentucky Primary Care Association;
n. The Kentucky Psychological Association; and
o. Leading Age Kentucky;
2. Two (2) appointments shall be made from a list of five (5) nominees
submitted by the Kentucky Medical Association of which at least one
(1) shall be a licensed and Medicaid-enrolled obstetrician;
3. One (1) appointment shall be made from a list of three (3) nominees
submitted by the Kentucky Association of Health Plans who shall
represent current managed care organizations with whom the
Department for Medicaid Services has contracted for the delivery of
Medicaid services;
4. Eight (8) appointments shall be made from the membership of the
Beneficiary Advisory Council established in Section 4 of this Act; and
5. The other six (6) appointive members shall, to ensure that membership
Page 2 of 13
XXXX 2/18/2025 3:49 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 946
of the committee is representative of the varied experiences of
Medicaid beneficiaries, be healthcare advocates knowledgeable about
health care and the healthcare industry of which:
a. One (1) shall be a representative of a recognized consumer
advocacy group representing the elderly;
b. One (1) shall be a representative of a recognized consumer
advocacy group representing individuals with behavioral health
needs;
c. One (1) shall be a representative of a recognized consumer
advocacy group representing persons reentering society
following incarceration; and
d. Three (3) shall be representatives of recognized consumer
advocacy groups whose membership includes low-income
individuals, children and youth, women, minorities, and disabled
persons.
(4) (a) Members of the Medicaid Advisory Committee appointed pursuant to
subsection (3)(d) of this section[ and] shall hold office for a term of not more
than four (4) years, except that:
1. The member appointed pursuant to subsection (3)(d)3. shall serve a
term of one (1) year; and
2. The other members first appointed upon the creation of the committee
shall serve as follows:
a. One-third (1/3) of the members shall be appointed for a term of
two (2) years;
b. One-third (1/3) of the members shall be appointed for a term of
three (3) years; and
c. One-third (1/3) of the members shall be appointed for a term of
Page 3 of 13
XXXX 2/18/2025 3:49 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 946
four (4) years;
with the respective terms of each member initially appointed upon
creation of the committee being designated by the commissioner at the
time of their appointments.[ and until their successors are appointed and
qualify, except that the members appointed to fill the first vacancy
occurring for a term beginning on July 1, 1960, shall be as follows: Two
(2) members shall be appointed for one (1) year, two (2) for two (2)
years, two (2) for three (3) years, and three (3) for four (4) years, and the
respective terms of the first members shall be designated by the
Governor at the time of their appointments.] Upon the expiration of the
respective terms of the members first appointed upon creation of the
committee, the term of each successor shall be for four (4) years[ and
until his successor is appointed and qualified. Thirteen (13) of the
appointments shall be made one (1) from each list of three (3) nominees
submitted by the following organizations: the Kentucky State Medical
Association; the Kentucky Dental Association; the Kentucky Hospital
Association; the Kentucky Medical Equipment Suppliers Association;
the Kentucky Pharmacists Association; the Kentucky Association of
Health Care Facilities; the Kentucky Nurses' Association; the State
Board of Podiatry; the Kentucky Home Care Association; the Kentucky
Optometric Association; the Kentucky Primary Care Association; the
Kentucky Association of Hospice and Palliative Care; and the Kentucky
Association of Homes and Services for the Aging, Inc. The other eight
(8) appointive members shall be healthcare advocates knowledgeable
about health care and the healthcare industry, and shall include three (3)
medical assistance recipients; one (1) representative of a recognized
consumer advocacy group representing the elderly; one (1)
Page 4 of 13
XXXX 2/18/2025 3:49 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 946
representative of a recognized consumer advocacy group representing
persons reentering society following incarceration; and three (3)
representatives of recognized consumer advocacy groups whose
membership includes low-income persons, children and youth, women,
minorities, and disabled persons].
(b) A member of the committee appointed pursuant to subsection (3)(d) of this
section shall not serve more than one (1) consecutive term after which time
he or she may not be reappointed to the board for a period of at least four
(4) years.
(5)[(2)] Each appointed[appointive] member of the Medicaid Advisory Committee[
Council] shall serve without compensation, but each council member not otherwise
compensated for his or her time or expenses shall be entitled to reimbursement for
his or her actual and necessary expenses in carrying out his or her duties with
reimbursement for expenses being made in accordance with state regulations
relating to travel reimbursement.
(6)[(3)] Vacancies shall be filled for the unexpired term in the same manner as
original appointments, maintaining representations as set out in subsection (3)[(1)]
of this section.
(7)[(4)] The Medicaid Advisory Committee[council] shall elect a co-chair,
vicechair[chairman, vice chairman], and secretary from among its members at its
first regular meeting in each fiscal year and shall adopt rules governing its
proceedings. The committee[council] shall hold a meeting at least once every three
(3) months and such other special or regular meetings as may be desired.
(8)[(5)] The six (6) members appointed pursuant to subsection (3)(d)5. of this
section[eight (8) appointive members who are healthcare advocates] shall not have
a fiduciary relationship or interest in any healthcare[health-care] facility or service.
Section 2. KRS 205.550 is amended to read as follows:
Page 5 of 13
XXXX 2/18/2025 3:49 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 946
(1) The Medicaid Advisory Committee and the Beneficiary Advisory Council[council]
shall advise the Cabinet for Health and Family Services about health and medical
care services.
(2) The Medicaid Advisory Committee and the Beneficiary Advisory Council[council]
shall have the opportunity for participation in policy development and program
administration and shall advise the Cabinet for Health and Family Services on such
matters.
(3) The Medicaid Advisory Committee and the Beneficiary Advisory Council[council]
shall give advice regarding how to further the participation of recipient members in
the policy development and program administration of the Medical Assistance
Program.
Section 3. KRS 205.590 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The following technical advisory committees shall be established for the purpose of
acting in an advisory capacity to the Medicaid Advisory Committee[Advisory
Council for Medical Assistance] with respect to the administration of the Medical
Assistance Program and in performing the function of peer review:
(a) A Technical Advisory Committee on Physician Services consisting of five (5)
physicians appointed by the council of the Kentucky State Medical
Association;
(b) A Technical Advisory Committee on Hospital Care consisting of five (5)
hospital administrators appointed by the board of trustees of the Kentucky
Hospital Association;
(c) A Technical Advisory Committee on Dental Care consisting of five (5)
dentists appointed by the Kentucky Dental Association;
(d) A Technical Advisory Committee on Nursing Service consisting of five (5)
nurses appointed by the board of directors of the Kentucky State Association
of Registered Nurses;
Page 6 of 13
XXXX 2/18/2025 3:49 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 946
(e) A Technical Advisory Committee on Nursing Home Care consisting of six (6)
members of which five (5) members shall be appointed by the Kentucky
Association of Health Care Facilities, and one (1) member shall be appointed
by the Kentucky Association of Nonprofit Homes and Services for the Aging,
Inc.;
(f) A Technical Advisory Committee on Optometric Care consisting of five (5)
members appointed by the Kentucky Optometric Association;
(g) A Technical Advisory Committee on Podiatric Care consisting of five (5)
podiatrists appointed by the Kentucky Podiatry Association;
(h) A Technical Advisory Committee on Primary Care consisting of five (5)
primary care providers, two (2) of whom shall represent licensed health
maintenance organizations, appointed by the Governor, until such time as an
association of primary care providers is established, whereafter the association
shall appoint the members;
(i) A Technical Advisory Committee on Home Health Care consisting of five (5)
members appointed by the board of directors of the Kentucky Home Health
Association;
(j) A Technical Advisory Committee on Consumer Rights and Client Needs
consisting of seven (7) members, with one (1) member to be appointed by
each of the following organizations: the American Association of Retired
Persons Kentucky, the Family Resource Youth Services Coalition of
Kentucky, the Kentucky Association of Community Health Workers, the
Kentucky Legal Services Corporation, the Arc of Kentucky, the Department
of Public Advocacy, and the National Association of Social Workers-
Kentucky Chapter;
(k) A Technical Advisory Committee on Behavioral Health consisting of seven
(7) members, with one (1) member to be appointed by each of the following
Page 7 of 13
XXXX 2/18/2025 3:49 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 946
organizations: the Kentucky Mental Health Coalition, the Kentucky
Association of Regional Programs, the National Alliance on Mental Illness
(NAMI) Kentucky, a statewide mental health consumer organization, the
People Advocating Recovery (PAR), the Brain Injury Association of
America-Kentucky Chapter, and the Kentucky Brain Injury Alliance;
(l) A Technical Advisory Committee on Children's Health consisting of ten (10)
members, with one (1) member to be appointed by each of the following
organizations: the Kentucky Chapter of the American Academy of Pediatrics,
the Kentucky PTA, the Kentucky Psychological Association, the Kentucky
School Nurses Association, the Kentucky Association for Early Childhood
Education, the Family Resource and Youth Services Coalition of Kentucky,
the Kentucky Youth Advocates, the Kentucky Association of Hospice and
Palliative Care, a parent of a child enrolled in Medicaid or the Kentucky
Children's Health Insurance Program appointed by the Kentucky Head Start
Association, and a pediatric dentist appointed by the Kentucky Dental
Association;
(m) A Technical Advisory Committee on Intellectual and Developmental
Disabilities consisting of nine (9) members, one (1) of whom shall be a
consumer who participates in a nonresidential community Medicaid waiver
program, one (1) of whom shall be a consumer who participates in a
residential community Medicaid waiver program, one (1) of whom shall be a
consumer representative of a family member who participates in a community
Medicaid waiver program, and one (1) of whom shall be a consumer
representative of a family member who resides in an ICF/ID facility that
accepts Medicaid payments, all of whom shall be appointed by the Governor;
one (1) member shall be appointed by the Arc of Kentucky; one (1) member
shall be appointed by the Commonwealth Council on Developmental
Page 8 of 13
XXXX 2/18/2025 3:49 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 946
Disabilities; one (1) member shall be appointed by the Kentucky Association
of Homes and Services for the Aging; and two (2) members shall be
appointed by the Kentucky Association of Private Providers, one (1) of whom
shall be a nonprofit provider and one (1) of whom shall be a for-profit
provider;
(n) A Technical Advisory Committee on Therapy Services consisting of six (6)
members, two (2) of whom shall be occupational therapists and shall be
appointed by the Kentucky Occupational Therapists Association, two (2) of
whom shall be physical therapists and shall be appointed by the Kentucky
Physical Therapy Association, and two (2) of whom shall be speech therapists
and shall be appointed by the Kentucky Speech-Language-Hearing
Association;
(o) A Technical Advisory Committee on Pharmacy consisting of seven (7)
members, two (2) of whom shall be Kentucky licensed pharmacists who own
fewer than ten (10) pharmacies in the Commonwealth and shall be appointed
by the Kentucky Independent Pharmacy Alliance, two (2) of whom shall be
Kentucky licensed pharmacists and shall be appointed by the Kentucky
Pharmacy Association, and one (1) member to be appointed by each of the
following organizations: the Kentucky Hospital Association, the Kentucky
Primary Care Association, and the National Association of Chain Drug
Stores;
(p) A Technical Advisory Committee on Persons Returning to Society from
Incarceration consisting of twelve (12) members of whom:
1. One (1) shall be appointed by each of the following organizations: the
Kentucky Jailers Association, the Kentucky Medical Association, the
Kentucky Association of Nurse Practitioners and Nurse-Midwives,
Community Action of Kentucky, the Homeless and Housing Coalition
Page 9 of 13
XXXX 2/18/2025 3:49 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 946
of Kentucky, the Kentucky Office of Drug Control Policy, a Kentucky
civil legal aid program, the Kentucky Department of Corrections, the
Kentucky Department of Public Advocacy, the Kentucky Association of
Regional Programs, and the Kentucky Administrative Office of the
Courts; and
2. One (1) formerly incarcerated individual who is a current or former
Medicaid recipient shall be appointed by Mental Health America of
Kentucky; and
(q) A Technical Advisory Committee on Emergency Medical Services consisting
of seven (7) members, one (1) of whom shall represent the air medical
industry and shall be appointed by the Kentucky Chapter of the Association of
Air Medical Services; one (1) of whom shall be appointed by the Kentucky
Board of Emergency Medical Services; two (2) of whom shall represent the
emergency medical services billing industry and shall be members of and
appointed by the Kentucky Ambulance Providers Association; two (2) of
whom shall represent ground ambulance providers and shall be appointed by
the Kentucky Ambulance Providers Association; and one (1) of whom shall
represent a fire-based emergency medical service and shall be appointed by
the Kentucky Association of Fire Chiefs. All members appointed to this
committee shall represent emergency medical services providers that operate
in Kentucky and shall have experience in interpreting, implementing, or
ensuring compliance with Medicaid regulations.
(2) The members of the technical advisory committees shall each serve for a term of
four (4) years and until their successors are appointed and qualified. Members of
the technical advisory committees shall not serve more than one (1) consecutive
term, after which time a member may not be reappointed to a technical advisory
committee for a period of at least four (4) years.
Page 10 of 13
XXXX 2/18/2025 3:49 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 946
(3) Each appointed[appointive] member of a committee shall serve without
compensation but shall be entitled to reimbursement for actual and necessary
expenses in carrying out their duties with reimbursement for expenses being made
in accordance with state regulations relating to travel reimbursement.
SECTION 4. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 205 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) The Beneficiary Advisory Council shall be established in accordance with 42
C.F.R. sec. 431.12.
(2) The Beneficiary Advisory Council shall advise the Cabinet for Health and Family
Services and the Department for Medicaid Services on matters related to policy
development and effective administration of the Medicaid program and may
advise on any topic identified in 42 C.F.R. sec. 431.12(g).
(3) The Beneficiary Advisory Council shall:
(a) Be separate from the Medicaid Advisory Committee established in Section 1
of this Act;
(b) Meet separately from the Medicaid Advisory Committee;
(c) Meet in advance of each Medicaid Advisory Committee meeting in order to
prepare council members for meetings of the committee; and
(d) Consist of the following nineteen (19) members appointed by the
commissioner of the Department for Medicaid Services in accordance with
subsections (4) and (5) of this section:
1. Eight (8) current Medicaid beneficiaries;
2. Five (5) former Medicaid beneficiaries;
3. Four (4) individuals who are the parents or guardians of a current
Medicaid beneficiary; and
4. Two (2) individuals who are paid or unpaid caregivers of a Medicaid
beneficiary.
Page 11 of 13
XXXX 2/18/2025 3:49 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 946
(4) In appointing members to the council, the commissioner of the Department for
Medicaid Services shall ensure that the council membership consist of
individuals who are currently or were previously Medicaid beneficiaries, have
direct experience supporting Medicaid beneficiaries including family members or
paid or unpaid caregivers of individuals enrolled in Medicaid, or who may have
experience with Medicaid managed care organizations, the foster care system,
1915(c) waivers, or behavioral health services.
(5) (a) Members of the Beneficiary Advisory Council shall serve for a term of not
more than four (4) years, except that the members first appointed upon
creation of the council shall serve as follows:
1. One-third (1/3) of the members shall be appointed for a term of two (2)
years;
2. One-third (1/3) of the members shall be appointed for a term of three
(3) years; and
3. One-third (1/3) of the members shall be appointed for a term of four
(4) years;
with the respective terms of each member initially appointed upon creation
of the council being designated by the commissioner at the time of their
appointments.
(b) A member of the council shall not serve more than one (1) consecutive term
after which time he or she may not be reappointed to the board for a period
of at least four (4) years.
(6) Members of the Beneficiary Advisory Council, including those who also serve on
the Medicaid Advisory Committee, shall be entitled to reimbursement, if
requested, for his or her actual and necessary expenses in carrying out his or her
duties with reimbursement for expenses being made in accordance with state
regulations relating to travel reimbursement.
Page 12 of 13
XXXX 2/18/2025 3:49 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 946
(7) Meetings of the Beneficiary Advisory Council shall be exempt from KRS 61.800
to 61.884. Consistent with 42 C.F.R. 431.12, a member of the council shall have
the option to include or exclude his or her name from documents posted by the
Department for Medicaid Services that include a list of members of the
Beneficiary Advisory Council, the Medicaid Advisory Committee, or the actions
of members record in publicly post meeting minutes.
Page 13 of 13
XXXX 2/18/2025 3:49 PM Jacketed